Utah statutes.
58-31b-801.   Practice within limits of competency.
(1)  Each person licensed under this chapter is responsible for confining his
practice as a nurse to those acts and practices permitted by law.
(2)  A person licensed under this act may not engage in any act or practice
for which he is not competent.
